src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lomanj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - ломань: # Ordinary nouns 'person/ henkilö' - full paradigm including MWN
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ломань
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+Indef: ломанень
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+Indef: ломаньда
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+Indef: ломаненди
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+Indef: ломаньфтома
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: ломаньшка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+Indef: ломаньца
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+Indef: ломаньцта
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+Indef: ломаньц
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+Indef: ломаньгя
     ломань+N+SP+Tra+Indef: ломанькс
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ломанезе
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ломанене
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ломанезень
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ломаньнень
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ломанезти, ломанезенди]
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ломаньненди
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: ломаньдон
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: ломаньфтомон
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: ломаньшкан
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: ломаньцон
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: ломаньцтон
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: ломанезон
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: ломаньгян
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ломаньце
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ломаньхне
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ломаньцень
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ломаньхнень
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: ломаньдот
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: ломаньфтомот
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: ломаньшкат
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: ломаньцот
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: ломаньцтот
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: ломанезот
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: ломаньгят
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ломаньц
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ломаненза
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ломаненц
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ломанензон
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ломаненцты
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ломанензонды
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: ломаньдонза
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: ломаньфтомонза
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: ломаньшканза
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: ломаньцонза
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: ломаньцтонза
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: ломаньзонза
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: ломаньгянза
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: ломаненьке
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: ломаненьконь
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: ломаненьконди
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: ломаньдонк
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: ломаньфтомонк
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: ломаньшканк
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: ломаньцонк
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: ломаньцтонк
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: ломаньзонк
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: ломаньгянк
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: ломаненте
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: ломанентень
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: ломанентенди
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: ломаньдонт
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: ломаньфтомонт
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: ломаньшкант
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: ломаньцонт
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: ломаньцтонт
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: ломанезонт
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: ломаньгянт
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: ломаньцна
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: ломаньцнон
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: ломаньцнонды
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: ломаньдост
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: ломаньфтомост
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: ломаньшкаст
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: ломаньцост
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: ломаньцтост
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: ломанезост
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: ломаньгяст
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ломатть
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ломаньць
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ломаньть
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [ломаньти, ломаненди]
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ломаттне
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ломаттень
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ломаттенди
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаневок
     #ломань+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаненьвок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаненьге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: сонга 
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньдовок
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаненьдивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньфтомовок
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньшкавок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньцовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньцтовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньцка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньгявок
     ломань+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: ломанькска
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломанезевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаненевок
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломанезеньге
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломанененьге
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [ломанезтивок, ломанезендивок]
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаненендивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаньдонга
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаньфтомонга
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаньшканка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаньцонга
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаньцтонга
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломанезонга
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ломаньгянга
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньцевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаттевок
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньценьге
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаттеньге
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньдотка
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньфтомотка
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньшкатка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньцотка
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньцтотка
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломанезотка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ломаньгятка
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньцевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломанензовок
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаненцка
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломанензонга
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаненцтывок
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломанензондывок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньдонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньфтомонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньшканзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньцонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньцтонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньзонзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ломаньгянзовок
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаненькевок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаненьконьге
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаненькондивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаньдонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаньфтомонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаньшканковок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаньцонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаньцтонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаньзонковок
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ломаньгянковок
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломанентевок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломанентеньге
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломанентендивок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломаньдонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломаньфтомонтовок
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломаньшкантовок
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломаньцонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломаньцтонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломанезонтка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ломаньгянтка
     ломань+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньцновок
     ломань+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньцнонга
     ломань+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньцнондывок
     ломань+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньдостка
     ломань+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньфтомостка
     ломань+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньшкастка
     ломань+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньцостка
     ломань+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньцтостка
     ломань+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломанезостка
     ломань+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ломаньгястка
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: ломаньхтка
     ломань+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: ломаньцьке
     ломань+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: ломаньтьке
     ломань+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [ломаньтивок, ломаненьдивок]
     ломань+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: ломаттевок
     ломань+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: ломаттеньге
     ломань+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: ломаттендивок
